Utah statutes.
26-21-13.5.   Intermediate care facilities for people with an intellectual disability -- Licensing.

(1) (a)  It is the Legislature's intent that a person with a developmental disability be provided with an environment and surrounding that, as closely as possible, resembles small community-based, homelike settings, to allow those persons to have the opportunity, to the maximum extent feasible, to exercise their full rights and responsibilities as citizens.

(b)  It is the Legislature's purpose, in enacting this section, to provide assistance and opportunities to enable a person with a developmental disability to achieve the person's maximum potential through increased independence, productivity, and integration into the community.

(2)  After July 1, 1990, the department may only license intermediate care beds for people with an intellectual disability in small health care facilities.

(3)  The department may define by rule "small health care facility" for purposes of licensure under this section and adopt rules necessary to carry out the requirements and purposes of this section.

(4)  This section does not apply to the renewal of a license or the licensure to a new owner of any facility that was licensed on or before July 1, 1990, and that licensure has been maintained without interruption.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

